apertium-cat-srd.srd.dix
<dictionary>
<!-- http://www.regione.sardegna.it/documenti/1_72_20060418160308.pdf -->
<!-- -->
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJLMNOPRSTUVZÀÈÒÌÙabcdefghijlmnoprstuvzàèòìùáéíóúKQYXWÍĞĀŚĘÉÂŞÖÑÇkqyxwíğāśęéâşöñıōṃçïū</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"      c="Noun"/> 
    <sdef n="det"    c="Determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="abbr"   c="Abbreviation"/> 
    <sdef n="acr"    c="Acronym"/> 
    <sdef n="adv"    c="Adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="preadv" c="Pre-adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="predet" c="Pre-determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="num"    c="Numeral"/> 
    <sdef n="np"     c="Proper noun"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex"  c="Verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vbmod"  c="Modal verb"/> 
    <sdef n="prn"    c="Pronom (Pronoun)"/> 
    <sdef n="pr"     c="Preposition"/> 
    <sdef n="adj"    c="Aggettivo (Adjective)"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Coordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Subordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Adverbial conjunction"/> 

    <sdef n="m"      c="Masculine"/> 
    <sdef n="f"      c="Feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="nt"     c="Neuter"/> 
    <sdef n="mf"     c="Masculine / feminine"/> 

    <sdef n="sg"     c="Singular"/> 
    <sdef n="pl"     c="Plural"/> 
    <sdef n="sp"     c="Singular / plural"/> 

    <sdef n="p1"     c="First person"/> 
    <sdef n="p2"     c="Second person"/> 
    <sdef n="p3"     c="Third person"/> 

    <sdef n="def"    c="Definite"/> 
    <sdef n="ind"    c="Indefinite"/> 
    <sdef n="itg"    c="Interrogative"/> 
    <sdef n="pos"    c="Possessive"/> 
    <sdef n="ord"    c="Ordinal"/> 
    <sdef n="ref"    c="Reflexive"/> 
    <sdef n="rel"    c="Relative"/> 
    <sdef n="pro"    c="Proclitic"/> 
    <sdef n="enc"    c="Enclitic"/> 
    <sdef n="dem"    c="Demonstrative"/> 
    <sdef n="tn"     c="Tónico"/> 

    <sdef n="an"     c="Animate / inanimate"/> 

    <sdef n="top"    c="Toponym"/> 
    <sdef n="ant"    c="Antroponym"/> 
    <sdef n="cog"    c="Cognomen"/> 
    <sdef n="al"     c="Altres"/> 

    <sdef n="pri"    c="Present indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="prs"    c="Present subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="pii"    c="Imperfect indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="pis"    c="Imperfect subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="pp"     c="Past participle"/> 
    <sdef n="ger"    c="Gerund"/> 
    <sdef n="inf"    c="Infinitive"/> 
    <sdef n="imp"    c="Imperative"/> 

    <sdef n="sent"   c="Sentence marker"/> 
    <sdef n="cm"     c="Comma"/> 
    <sdef n="lpar"   c="Left parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="rpar"   c="Right parenthesis"/> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lpar">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rpar">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Clitics -->

    <pardef n="S__cantende·nche">
      <e>       <p><l>·lu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·los</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·las</l><r>la<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__cantende·bos">
      <e>       <p><l>·lu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nche</l><r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nche</l><r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende·nche"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nde</l><r>nde<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__cantende·nos">
      <e>       <p><l>·lu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nche</l><r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nche</l><r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende·nche"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nde</l><r>nde<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__cantende·mi">
      <e>       <p><l>·lu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nche</l><r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nche</l><r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende·nche"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nde</l><r>nde<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__cantende·ti">
      <e>       <p><l>·lu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nche</l><r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nche</l><r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende·nche"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nde</l><r>nde<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__cantende·si">
      <e>       <p><l>·lu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nche</l><r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nche</l><r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende·nche"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nde</l><r>nde<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__cantende·bi">
      <e>       <p><l>·lu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nche</l><r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nche</l><r>nche<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende·nche"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·nde</l><r>nde<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__cantare">
      <e>       <p><l>·si</l><r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·si</l><r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende·si"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>·los</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="lpar"/></e>
    <e><par n="rpar"/></e>
